Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Revenue;

(2) Eligible expenditure means any cost incurred for the improvement of historically significant real property located in the State of Nebraska, including, but not limited to, qualified rehabilitation expenditures as defined in section 47(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the related regulations thereunder, if such improvement is in conformance with the standards;

(3) Historically significant real property means a building or an at-grade or aboveground structure used for any purpose, except for a single-family detached residence, which, at the time of final approval of the work by the officer pursuant to section 77-2906, is:

(a) Individually listed in the National Register of Historic Places;

(b)(i) Located within a district listed in the National Register of Historic Places; and

(ii) Determined by the officer as being historically significant to such district;

(c)(i) Individually designated pursuant to a landmark ordinance or resolution enacted by a political subdivision of the state, which ordinance or resolution has been approved by the officer; and

(ii) Determined by the officer as being historically significant; or

(d)(i) Located within a district designated pursuant to a preservation ordinance or resolution enacted by a county, city, or village of the state or political body comprised thereof providing for the rehabilitation, preservation, or restoration of historically significant real property, which ordinance or resolution has been approved by the officer; and

(ii) Determined by the officer as contributing to the historical significance or economic viability of such district;

(4) Improvement means a rehabilitation, preservation, or restoration project that contributes to the basis, functionality, or value of the historically significant real property and has a total cost which equals or exceeds five thousand dollars;

(5) Officer means the State Historic Preservation Officer;

(6) Person means any natural person, political subdivision, limited liability company, partnership, private domestic or private foreign corporation, or domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation certified pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(7) Placed in service means that either (a) a temporary or final certificate of occupancy has been issued for the improvement or (b) the improvement is sufficiently complete to allow for the intended use of the improvement; and

(8) Standards means (a) the Secretary of the Interior's Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties as promulgated by the United States Department of the Interior or (b) specific standards for the rehabilitation, preservation, and restoration of historically significant real property contained in a duly adopted local preservation ordinance or resolution that has been approved by the officer pursuant to section 77-2903.

Laws 2014, LB191, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 78.